extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX Y   y           ejsom/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsou/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsimi/Fs  [bklmnprtv]y is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsimi/Fs  [bklmnprtv]y is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsimi/Fs  [bklmnprtv]y is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsia/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           ejsi/Fs    [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           ejsieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsej/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsiemu/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejsiemu/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejsej/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejsej/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsim/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsiu/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsich/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsom/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejsom/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejsou/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsimi/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsimi/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsimi/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]y is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           sie/Fs     [dh]y po:adverb
SFX Y   y           sie/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sie/Fs     [dh]y is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sie/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sie/Fs     [dh]y is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sia/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           si/Fs      [dh]y is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           si/Fs      [dh]y is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sieho/Fs   [dh]y is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           sieho/Fs   [dh]y is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           sieho/Fs   [dh]y is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           sej/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:locative
SFX Y   y           sej/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           sich/Fs    [dh]y is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sich/Fs    [dh]y is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sich/Fs    [dh]y is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           siemu/Fs   [dh]y is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   y           siemu/Fs   [dh]y is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   y           sej/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   y           sim/Fs     [dh]y is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sim/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sim/Fs     [dh]y is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           sim/Fs     [dh]y is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           sim/Fs     [dh]y is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           siu/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           sich/Fs    [dh]y is:masculine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   y           sich/Fs    [dh]y is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   y           sich/Fs    [dh]y is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           som/Fs     [dh]y is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   y           som/Fs     [dh]y is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           sou/Fs     [dh]y is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           simi/Fs    [dh]y is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           simi/Fs    [dh]y is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           simi/Fs    [dh]y is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
