extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Avarov/Y po:adjective
Bohumilov/Y po:adjective
Ceskomoravsky/YN po:adjective
Dubovsky/YN po:adjective
Floridanov/Y po:adjective
Hadacova/Y po:adjective
Hradocky/YN po:adjective
Jasovsky/YN po:adjective
Klatova/Y po:adjective
Kualalumpurcanov/Y po:adjective
Makovsky/YN po:adjective
Nagasacanov/Y po:adjective
Persky/YN po:adjective
Rochova/Y po:adjective
Simonov/Y po:adjective
Stiavnicanov/Y po:adjective
Valentova/Y po:adjective
ablativny/YN po:adjective
advokatsky/YN po:adjective
aky/Y po:adjective
analgeticky/YN po:adjective
antisemitsky/YN po:adjective
argoticky/YN po:adjective
atomistov/Y po:adjective
bacilovy/YN po:adjective
barmansky/YN po:adjective
berylovy/YN po:adjective
bezprizorny/Y po:adjective
binarny/YN po:adjective
blizunky/Y po:adjective
bosporsky/YN po:adjective
bruntalsky/YN po:adjective
bystrozraky/YN po:adjective
celosvetovy/YN po:adjective
cervivy/YN po:adjective
chlpkavy/YN po:adjective
chvalenkarov/Y po:adjective
cirkevnikov/Y po:adjective
criplavy/YN po:adjective
daleky/YN po:adjective
definovatelny/YN po:adjective
demoticky/YN po:adjective
devatclenny/YN po:adjective
diferencovany/YN po:adjective
divossky/YN po:adjective
dogmatikov/Y po:adjective
domnely/YN po:adjective
dostaty/YN po:adjective
drazeny/YN po:adjective
dualny/Y po:adjective
dvojcestny/YN po:adjective
dvojznacny/YN po:adjective
elektroinstalacny/Y po:adjective
epistolarny/YN po:adjective
exekutivny/YN po:adjective
faktorovy/Y po:adjective
fesakov/Y po:adjective
fluidovy/Y po:adjective
frazeologov/Y po:adjective
galsky/YN po:adjective
gigantov/Y po:adjective
grilazovy/Y po:adjective
hanacky/YN po:adjective
heslarov/Y po:adjective
hluchonemy/YN po:adjective
holeny/YN po:adjective
hotelierov/Y po:adjective
hroziaci/YN po:adjective
hyacintovy/YN po:adjective
ilegitimny/YN po:adjective
indukcny/YN po:adjective
instrumentarov/Y po:adjective
investorsky/YN po:adjective
janosikovsky/YN po:adjective
jednohodinovy/YN po:adjective
jezuitov/Y po:adjective
kalerabovy/YN po:adjective
kaporov/Y po:adjective
kastrolovy/YN po:adjective
kladovy/YN po:adjective
kmitoctovy/YN po:adjective
kolkorocny/YN po:adjective
konakovy/YN po:adjective
konstrukterov/Y po:adjective
kopytnikov/Y po:adjective
kostymcekovy/YN po:adjective
kraterovy/YN po:adjective
krizujuci/Y po:adjective
kudelovy/Y po:adjective
kvapavkovy/YN po:adjective
lajniakov/Y po:adjective
lecovy/YN po:adjective
liahensky/YN po:adjective
listerovy/YN po:adjective
lucnaty/YN po:adjective
mafistov/Y po:adjective
maloobchodny/YN po:adjective
marsalov/Y po:adjective
mazovy/YN po:adjective
menivy/YN po:adjective
mikroskopicky/YN po:adjective
mizivy/YN po:adjective
mocovy/YN po:adjective
montanny/YN po:adjective
mucitelov/Y po:adjective
nabrezny/YN po:adjective
nadrzkovy/YN po:adjective
nakladacov/Y po:adjective
naparovany/YN po:adjective
nasadovy/YN po:adjective
nauticky/YN po:adjective
nedozersky/YN po:adjective
neurastenikov/Y po:adjective
nivelizovany/YN po:adjective
novorodencov/Y po:adjective
obijany/YN po:adjective
obrasteny/YN po:adjective
ochotnicky/YN po:adjective
odiozny/YN po:adjective
odpracovany/YN po:adjective
odvrateny/YN po:adjective
okultisticky/YN po:adjective
opatrovnicky/YN po:adjective
ordinarny/YN po:adjective
osklivcov/Y po:adjective
osvojensky/YN po:adjective
ozrutansky/YN po:adjective
pankov/Y po:adjective
parovy/YN po:adjective
patricny/YN po:adjective
pepitovy/YN po:adjective
piaristicky/YN po:adjective
planetocentricky/YN po:adjective
plnofarebny/YN po:adjective
pochvalny/YN po:adjective
podmoskovsky/YN po:adjective
podviazany/YN po:adjective
pokrytcov/Y po:adjective
polopatisticky/YN po:adjective
pomedzny/YN po:adjective
poprevazovany/YN po:adjective
poskromny/YN po:adjective
potajmy/YN po:adjective
povrchny/YN po:adjective
prachovy/YN po:adjective
prebudzajuci/YN po:adjective
predminuly/YN po:adjective
prehlaseny/YN po:adjective
premerany/YN po:adjective
prepracovany/YN po:adjective
pretekany/YN po:adjective
prezuvavcov/Y po:adjective
priestrelny/YN po:adjective
prioritny/YN po:adjective
prisuseny/YN po:adjective
prohibicny/YN po:adjective
protimensinovy/YN po:adjective
psenicny/YN po:adjective
racharozovy/YN po:adjective
rasmavy/YN po:adjective
regeneracny/YN po:adjective
reprezentovany/YN po:adjective
rieducky/YN po:adjective
rovnany/YN po:adjective
rozhoruceny/YN po:adjective
roznosmerne/YN po:adjective
rozsiahly/YN po:adjective
ruciaci/Y po:adjective
ryty/YN po:adjective
samopasnikov/Y po:adjective
satelitny/YN po:adjective
sedemosminovy/YN po:adjective
semilsky/Y po:adjective
sestuholnikovy/YN po:adjective
silnoprudovy/YN po:adjective
skartacny/YN po:adjective
skonceny/YN po:adjective
skryvkovy/YN po:adjective
slalomarsky/YN po:adjective
slubny/YN po:adjective
sobasny/YN po:adjective
spadovy/YN po:adjective
spiritisticky/YN po:adjective
spolumajitelsky/YN po:adjective
spresnovany/YN po:adjective
stamgastov/Y po:adjective
stavebnicky/YN po:adjective
stmelene/YN po:adjective
straznikov/Y po:adjective
strojny/YN po:adjective
stvority/YN po:adjective
subojovy/YN po:adjective
sumcov/Y po:adjective
svackov/Y po:adjective
svindliarsky/YN po:adjective
tabletovany/YN po:adjective
taxikarsky/YN po:adjective
teologov/Y po:adjective
tienovany/YN po:adjective
tolicizny/YN po:adjective
transkontinentalny/YN po:adjective
triedne/YN po:adjective
trojvlaknovy/YN po:adjective
turcecky/YN po:adjective
ucesovy/YN po:adjective
uhorsky/YN po:adjective
umerne/YN po:adjective
upoteny/YN po:adjective
uskutocnovany/YN po:adjective
utlmeny/YN po:adjective
uzlikovy/YN po:adjective
varovny/YN po:adjective
velkokrtissky/YN po:adjective
vetrakovy/YN po:adjective
vidomy/YN po:adjective
vlakninovy/YN po:adjective
vodoznakovy/YN po:adjective
vrcholne/YN po:adjective
vtahovany/YN po:adjective
vyciarknuty/YN po:adjective
vyhrevny/YN po:adjective
vylisovany/YN po:adjective
vyplyvajuci/YN po:adjective
vysinuty/YN po:adjective
vystavovaatelsky/YN po:adjective
vyumelkovane/YN po:adjective
vzduchoprazdny/YN po:adjective
zabijackovy/YN po:adjective
zadychany/YN po:adjective
zakladajuci/Y po:adjective
zametacov/Y po:adjective
zapekackovy/YN po:adjective
zasineny/YN po:adjective
zatratencov/Y po:adjective
zbabrany/YN po:adjective
zdovodneny/YN po:adjective
zensky/YN po:adjective
zinjantropov/Y po:adjective
zlcopudny/YN po:adjective
zmitoreny/YN po:adjective
znormovany/YN po:adjective
zostrucneny/YN po:adjective
zrnovy/YN po:adjective
zvedeny/YN po:adjective
zvysujuci/Y po:adjective
